Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1004
Management of districts.

After the interstate conservation improvement or recreational district plan is adopted by the proper authorities having jurisdiction thereof, the proper governing body or bodies may agree with the proper authorities of the other state or states involved as to the organization for management or supervision, development, maintenance, and use of the said area or areas and may exercise the same powers and perform the same duties in connection with the district or districts that are established as is now authorized for such conservation or recreational area located entirely within the state.

Laws 1935, c. 39, § 4, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1704;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-904.